Utah statutes.
32A-4a-204 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission and department duties before
granting resort license.
(1) (a)  Before the commission may grant a resort license, the department
shall conduct an investigation, and may hold public hearings for the purpose
of gathering information and making recommendations to the commission as to
whether or not a resort license, including each sublicense, should be granted.
(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations
described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's
determination.
(2)  Before granting a resort license, the commission shall:
(a)  determine that the applicant complies with all basic qualifications and
requirements for making an application for a resort license as provided by
Sections 32A-4a-202 and 32A-4a-203;
(b)  determine that the application is complete;
(c)  consider, where appropriate, a location that the resort license applicant
proposes to designate for use under the resort license or a sublicense,
including:
(i)  the physical characteristics of the location such as:
(A)  the condition of the location;
(B)  square footage; and
(C)  parking availability; and
(ii)  operational factors such as:
(A)  tourist traffic;
(B)  demographics; and
(C)  population to be served;
(d)  consider the resort license applicant's ability to manage and operate a
resort license and the ability of any individual who will act in a supervisory
or managerial capacity for a sublicense, including:
(i)  past management experience;
(ii)  past alcohol license experience; and
(iii)  the type of management scheme to be employed by the resort license
applicant;
(e)  consider the nature or type of:
(i)  the resort license applicant's business operation; and
(ii)  the business operation of each sublicense;
(f)  subject to Subsection (3), determine that each sublicense meets the
requirements imposed under the provisions applicable to each sublicense; and
(g)  consider any other factor or circumstance the commission considers
necessary.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), notwithstanding the requirements to
obtain a license under the provisions applicable to a sublicense, a sublicense
of a resort license is not subject to:
(i)  a requirement to submit an application or renewal application that is
separate from the resort license application;
(ii)  a requirement to carry public liability insurance or dramshop insurance
coverage that is separate from that carried by the resort licensee; or
(iii)  post a bond that is separate from the bond posted by the resort
licensee.
(b)  If a resort licensee seeks to add a sublicense after its resort license
is granted, the resort licensee shall file with the department:
(i)  a nonrefundable $250 application fee;
(ii)  an initial license fee of $2,000, which is refundable if the sublicense
is not granted;
(iii)  written consent of the local authority;
(iv)  a copy of:
(A)  the resort licensee's current business license; and
(B)  the current business license for the sublicense, if the business licensee
is separate from the resort licensee's business license;
(v)  evidence that the sublicense premises is entirely within the boundary of
the resort building;
(vi)  a description, floor plan, and boundary map of the sublicense premises
designating:
(A)  a location at which the resort license applicant proposes that an
alcoholic beverage be stored; and
(B)  a designated location on the sublicense premises from which the resort
license applicant proposes that an alcoholic beverage be sold, dispensed,
served, and consumed;
(vii)  evidence that the resort license applicant carries public liability
insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;
(viii)  evidence that the resort license applicant carries dramshop insurance
coverage in the amount required by Section 32A-4a-202 that covers the
sublicense to be added;
(ix)  a signed consent form stating that the resort licensee will permit any
authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law
enforcement officer unrestricted right to enter the sublicense premises;
(x)  if the resort licensee is a partnership, corporation, or limited
liability company, proper verification evidencing that the one or more persons
signing the sublicense application are authorized to so act on behalf of the
partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and
(xi)  any other information the commission or department may require.
